Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-809
Counselor of conciliation; counties with less than 250,000 inhabitants; personnel; appointment; compensation.

(1) In each county having a population of less than two hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, the county court and district court may appoint, with the consent and approval of the board of county commissioners, the following persons to assist the conciliation court in disposing of its business and carrying out its functions:

(a) One counselor of conciliation who shall have the powers provided in subsection (2) of section 42-808; and

(b) Such associate counselors and office assistants as may be required to properly handle the work of the court.

(2) The salaries of persons appointed under the provisions of this section shall be fixed by the board of county commissioners of the county. All persons appointed under the provisions of this section may be dismissed for any reason by a majority vote of the judges of the district court of the county.

(3) The board of county commissioners shall furnish adequate office space, equipment, and supplies for the use of the personnel of the conciliation court.

(4) The county court and district court or the board of county commissioners may, at any time, abolish any or all positions created pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 9, p. 657;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 28.